sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Jazda na inline a kolieskových korčuliach > Ochranné pomôcky na jazdu na inline a kolieskových korčuliach: Rukavice na inline a kolieskové korčule; Prilby na inline a kolieskové korčule; Ochranné šortky; Chrániče na kolieskové korčule; Ochranné súpravy na kolieskové korčule; Chrániče zápästia na inline a kolieskové korčule; Chrániče prstov a špičky topánok
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jazda na wrotkach i łyżworolkach > Sprzęt ochronny do jazdy na wrotkach i łyżworolkach: Rękawiczki do jazdy na rolkach i wrotkach; Kaski na rolki i wrotki; Spodenki ochronne; Ochraniacze do jazdy na wrotkach i łyżworolkach; Zestawy ochraniaczy do jazdy na wrotkach; Ochraniacze nadgarstków na wrotki; Ochraniacze nosków
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Каране на ролери и ролкови кънки > Защитна екипировка за каране на ролери и ролкови кънки: Ръкавици за каране на кънки; Каски за каране на кънки; Защитни шорти; Протектори за каране на ролкови кънки; Комплекти защитна екипировка за ролери; Накитници за каране на кънки; Предпазители за пръсти и капачки за пръсти
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Πατινάζ εντός & εκτός δρόμου > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός τροχοπέδιλων μονής σειράς τροχών και πατινιών: Γάντια για ρόλερ και inline πατίνια; Κράνη για ρόλερ και inline πατίνια; Προστατευτικά σορτς; Επιθέματα προστασίας για πατίνια; Σετ προστατευτικού εξοπλισμού για ρόλερ; Προστατευτικά καρπού για ρόλερ; Προστατευτικά δακτύλων
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Patinaje sobre ruedas y en línea > Protecciones para patinaje sobre ruedas y en línea: Guantes para patinaje sobre ruedas y en línea; Cascos para patinaje sobre ruedas y en línea; Pantalones cortos protectores; Almohadillas para patinaje sobre ruedas; Sets de equipo de protección para patinaje sobre ruedas; Muñequeras para patinaje sobre ruedas; Protectores y punteras
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Inline- és görkorcsolya > Inline- és görkorcsolya-védőfelszerelés: Görkorcsolyás kesztyűk; Görkorcsolyás sisakok; Védőnadrágok; Görkorcsolyabetétek; Görkorcsolyás védőfelszerelés-készletek; Görkorcsolya-csuklóvédők; Orrvédők
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Patinaj cu role în linie și patinaj cu rotile > Echipament de protecție pentru patinaj cu role în linie și patinaj cu rotile: Mănuși pentru role și patine cu rotile; Căști pentru patinaj pe role sau patine cu rotile; Pantaloni scurți de protecție; Inserții pentru patinaj cu role în linie; Seturi de echipament de protecție pentru patinaj cu role; Protecții de încheietură pentru patinaj pe rotile; Protecții și capace pentru vârful patinei
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 直排轮滑/四轮旱冰 > 直排轮滑/四轮旱冰护具: 直排轮滑和双排轮滑手套; 直排轮滑与双排轮滑头盔; 防护短裤; 四轮旱冰护垫; 轮滑防护装备套装; 轮滑护腕; 鞋头护具与保护套
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Rullaluistelu > Rullaluistelusuojukset: Rullaluisteluhanskat; Rullaluistelukypärät; Suojashortsit; Rullaluistelusuojat; Rullaluistelun suojavarustesetit; Rullaluistelun rannesuojat; Kärkisuojat ja kärkikupit
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Rolanje in kotalkanje > Zaščitna oprema za rolanje in kotalkanje: Rokavice za rolanje in kotalkanje; Čelade za rolanje in kotalkanje; Zaščitne kratke hlače; Ščitniki za kotalkanje; Kompleti zaščitne opreme za rolanje; Ščitniki za zapestja za kotalkanje; Ščitniki in kapice za prste
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Inline og rulleskøyter > Beskyttelsesutstyr for rulleskøyter: Hansker for inline- og rulleskøyter; Hjelmer for inline- og rulleskøyter; Beskyttelsesshorts; Rulleskøytebeskyttere; Sett med verneutstyr for rulleskøyting; Håndleddsbeskyttere for rulleskøyting; Tåbeskyttere og tåkapper
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Inline & Roller Skating > Inline & Roller Skating Protective Gear: Inline & Roller Skating Gloves; Inline & Roller Skating Helmets; Protective Shorts; Roller Skating Pads; Roller Skating Protective Gear Sets; Roller Skating Wrist Guards; Toe Guards & Toe Caps
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trượt pa-tanh và pa-tanh một hàng > Thiết bị bảo vệ trượt pa-tanh và pa-tanh một hàng: Găng tay trượt patin; Mũ bảo hiểm trượt patin; Quần bảo hộ; Đệm trượt pa-tanh; Bộ đồ bảo hộ trượt patin; Đệm cổ tay trượt patin; Đệm & chụp bảo vệ mũi giày
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > インラインスケート・ローラースケート > インラインスケート・ローラースケート用プロテクター: インライン＆ローラースケート用グローブ; インライン＆ローラースケート用ヘルメット; プロテクトショーツ; ローラースケート用パッド; ローラースケート用プロテクターセット; ローラースケート用リストガード; トゥガード＆トゥキャップ
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Skaten > Schutzausrüstung für Skater: Inline- & Rollschuh-Handschuhe; Inline- & Rollschuhhelme; Schutzshorts; Rollschuh-Polster; Rollschuh-Schutzausrüstungssets; Rollschuh-Handgelenkschoner; Zehenschützer & -kappen
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > In-line a kolečkové brusle > Ochranné pomůcky pro in-line a kolečkové brusle: Rukavice na inline a kolečkové brusle; Helmy na inline a kolečkové brusle; Ochranné šortky; In-line chrániče; Sady chráničů na kolečkové brusle; Chrániče zápěstí na kolečkové brusle; Chrániče špiček na brusle
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Pattinaggio in linea e tradizionale > Protezioni per pattinaggio in linea e tradizionale: Guanti per pattinaggio a rotelle e in linea; Caschi da pattinaggio a rotelle e in linea; Pantaloncini protettivi; Imbottiture per pattinaggio in linea e tradizionale; Set di protezioni da pattinaggio a rotelle; Polsiere da pattinaggio a rotelle; Protezioni e puntali
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Patinagem com patins em linha e de 4 rodas > Equipamento de proteção para patinagem com patins em linha e de 4 rodas: Luvas de patins em linha e de 4 rodas; Capacetes de patins em linha e de 4 rodas; Calções de proteção; Proteções para patinagem com patins de 4 rodas; Conjuntos de equipamento de proteção de patinagem; Protetores de pulsos de patinagem; Protetores de biqueira e capas
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Patin à roulettes et roller > Équipement de protection pour roller et patin à roulettes: Gants de patins à roulettes et rollers; Casques de rollers et patins à roulettes; Shorts de protection; Genouillères de patin à roulettes; Ensembles d’équipements de protection de roller; Protège-poignets de roller; Protège-pointes et butoirs
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Rulleskøjter og inlinere > Beskyttelsesudstyr til rulleskøjter og inlinere: Handsker til inline- og rulleskøjter; Hjelme til inline- og rulleskøjter; Beskyttelsesshorts; Beskyttelsesudstyr til rulleskøjteløb; Beskyttelsessæt til rulleskøjter; Håndledsbeskyttere til rulleskøjter; Tåbeskyttere og tåkapper
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Ratukinių pačiūžų ir riedučių sportas > Ratukinių pačiūžų ir riedučių apsauginė įranga: Ratukinių pačiūžų ir riedučių pirštinės; Ratukinių pačiūžų ir riedučių šalmai; Apsauginiai šortai; Apsaugos riedutininkams; Riedučių apsaugos įrangos komplektai; Riedučių riešų apsaugos; Pirštų apsaugos ir pirštų gaubtai
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Inline- och rullskridskoåkning > Skyddsutrustning för inline- och rullskridskoåkning: Handskar för inlines och rullskridskor; Hjälmar för inlines och rullskridskor; Skyddsshorts; Rullskridskoskydd; Skyddsutrustningsset för rullskridskoåkning; Handledsskydd för rullskridskoåkning; Tåskydd och tåhättor
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 인라인/롤러 스케이팅 > 인라인/롤러 스케이트 보호 장비: 인라인 및 롤러스케이트 장갑; 인라인 및 롤러스케이트 헬멧; 보호용 쇼츠; 롤러 스케이트 보호대; 롤러스케이트 보호 장비 세트; 롤러스케이트 손목 보호대; 토 가드 및 토 캡
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Patinação inline e sobre rodas > Equipamento de proteção para patinação inline e sobre rodas: Luvas para patins in-line e tradicionais; Capacetes para patins in-line e tradicionais; Bermudas de proteção; Protetores para patinação sobre rodas; Conjuntos de proteção para patinação; Munhequeiras para patinação; Protetores e capas para biqueiras
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Inline ve Roller Paten > Inline ve Roller Paten Koruyucu Kıyafetleri: Sıralı ve tekerlekli paten eldivenleri; Sıralı ve tekerlekli paten kaskları; Koruyucu şortlar; Roller Paten Pedleri; Tekerlekli paten koruyucu ekipman setleri; Tekerlekli paten bileklikleri; Burun koruyucular ve burunluklar
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 直排輪/雙排輪 > 直排輪/雙排輪護具: 直排輪與滑輪手套; 直排輪與滑輪頭盔; 防摔褲; 滑輪護墊; 滑輪護具套組; 滑輪護腕; 鞋頭保護套
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > อินไลน์และโรลเลอร์สเกต > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันของอินไลน์และโรลเลอร์สเกต: ถุงมืออินไลน์สเกตและโรลเลอร์สเกต; หมวกกันน็อกอินไลน์สเกตและโรลเลอร์สเกต; กางเกงซับแรงกระแทก; ชุดป้องกันสำหรับโรลเลอร์สเกต; ชุดอุปกรณ์ป้องกันโรลเลอร์สเกต; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันข้อมือโรลเลอร์สเกต; ที่ครอบหัวรองเท้าสเกต
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Катание на роликах > Защитная экипировка для катания на роликах: Перчатки для катания на роликах; Шлемы для катания на роликах; Защитные шорты; Наколенники и налокотники для катания на роликах; Наборы защиты для катания на роликах; Защита запястий для катания на роликах; Защита мыска для роликовых коньков
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Rolanje i koturanje > Zaštitna oprema za rolanje i koturanje: Rukavice za rolanje i koturanje; Kacige za rolanje i koturanje; Zaštitne kratke hlače; Štitnici za rolanje; Kompleti zaštitne opreme za rolanje; Štitnici za zglobove za rolanje; Štitnici i kapice za nožne prste
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Inlineskaten en rollerskaten > Beschermende uitrusting voor inlineskaten en rollerskaten: Handschoenen voor inline skaten en rolschaatsen; Helmen voor inline skaten en rolschaatsen; Beschermende shorts; Beschermpads voor rollerskaten; Beschermingssets voor rolschaatsen; Polsbeschermers voor rolschaatsen; Neusbeschermers en neuskappen